Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.98.060

Emergency—1955 c 33.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.98.060. Formerly RCW 30.98.060.]